esperanto.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+R !Root

!Parts of speech (POS)
+V  !Verb
    +Past   !Past
    +Pres   !Present
    +Fut    !Future
    +Inf    !Infinitive
    +Imp !Imperative

+N !Noun
    +Sing ! Singular
    +Plu !Plural
        +Nom !Nominative
        +Acc !Accusative



! Lexicon containing lexical stems:
LEXICON Root
 mangx R ;!'eat';
 lern R ;!'learn;
 romp R ;!'break';
 vol R ;!'want';
 sxat R ;!'like';
 demand R ;!'ask';
 konstru R ;!'make';
 don R ;!'give';
 elekt R ;!'choose';
 vid R ;!'see';


! Lexicon containing POS tag only:
LEXICON R
+R: R-pos;

! Lexicon containing inflectional suffixes and corresponding tags:
LEXICON R-pos
+V: V-suff;
+N:o Number;

!Verbs
LEXICON V-suff
+Past:is    #; !Past
+Pres:as    #; !Present
+Fut:os #;  !Future
+Inf:i  #;  !Infinitive
+Imp:u  #;  !Imperative

!Nouns
LEXICON Number
+Sing: Case; !Singular
+Plu:j Case; !Plural

LEXICON Case
+Nom:    #; !Nominative
+Acc:n  #; !Accusative

! mangx-o-j-n (mangx+R+N+Plu+Acc)

!NEW Words to try:
!   don+R+N+Plu+Acc (donojn) 'gifts'
!   konstru+R+V+Imp (konstruu) 'build!'
!   demand+R+N+Sing+Nom (demando) 'a question'

!Example: $ echo don+R+N+Plu+Acc | hfst-lookup esperanto.hfst
